src-fst-morphology-affixes-numerals.lexc.md
+Sg+Com:%>jn K ;           
+Ess:n K ;                 
+Sg+Com:jn K ;             
+Sg+Com+Attr:jn     K ;  
+Pl+Nom:    K ;                
+Pl+Gen:j   K ;               
+Pl+Acc:jt  K ;              
+Pl+Ill:jda K ;             
+Pl+Ine:jn  K ;              
+Pl+Ela:js  K ;              
+Pl+Com:j   K ;               

+Ess:a%>n  K ;   
+Ess+Use/NG:e%>n  K ; ! not sure about the e-ending, dont think its standardized
+Sg+Gen:%- K ; ! ???            
+Sg+Com:jn K ;                        

+Ess:n K ; 
+Sg+Com:jn K ;          

+Ess:n K ;
+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:v  K ;
+Sg+Com:jn K ;             
+Sg+Com+Attr:jn K ;    

+Sg+Nom:%>a K ;   
+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:%>e K ;                         
+Ess:a%>n K ;   
+Ess+Use/NG:e%>n K ;   

+Sg+Nom:e%>  K ;          
+Ess:e%>n K ;     
+Pl+Nom:   K ;          
+Sg+Com:jn  K ;
+Sg+Com+Attr:jn  K ;   
+Pl+Com:j   K ;         

* **LEXICON ARABICCOMPOUNDS**  ! arabic as first part, 

* **LEXICON ARABICCASES**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON ARABICCASE**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON ARABICCASE0**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON DIGITCASES**  to distinguish between 0 and oblique

* **LEXICON DIGITCASE0**

+Num:   ROMNUMTAGOBL ;

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-smj/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc)</small>

---
